Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-613
Violations; penalties.

Any person in violation
of section 54-601 or 54-608 shall be deemed guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws
1961, c. 268, § 7, p. 788;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 20;

Laws 1988, LB 630, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 801, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 12.